Utah statutes.
7-17-9.   Actions on accounts established prior to 1979 -- Limitations on
recovery.
(1)  With respect to any reserve account established prior to July 1, 1979 and
for which no legal action is pending as of January 1, 1979, no recovery shall
be had in any action brought to require payment of interest on, or other
compensation for, the use prior to July 1, 1979, of the funds in such account
unless:
(a)  An agreement in writing expressly so providing was executed by the
borrower and the lender; or
(b)  The borrower, or his successors or assigns, establishes by clear and
convincing evidence an agreement between the parties that the lender would pay
interest on or to otherwise compensate the borrower for the use of the funds
in such account.  Use in the loan documents of such words as "trust" or
"pledge" alone does not establish the intent of the parties; and
(c)  There is no federal law or regulation prohibiting the payment of interest
on or otherwise compensating the borrower for the use of the funds in such an
account.
(2)  No action seeking payment of interest on or other compensation for the
use of the funds in any reserve account for any period prior to July 1, 1979,
shall be brought after June 30, 1981.  Any recovery in any such action shall
be limited to the four-year period immediately preceding the commencement of
the action.  No recovery shall be had in respect of any reserve account
established prior to July 1, 1979 greater than if the provisions of Section
7-17-3 of this act were applicable to such accounts.
(3)  With respect to any reserve account established prior to July 1, 1979, an
agreement in writing between the lender and the borrower, or his successors or
assigns, that (a) the provisions of Section 7-17-3 of this act shall apply to
all payments made subsequent to July 1, 1979, or (b) the borrower may
exercise, for the period subsequent to July 1, 1979, either of the options
provided in Section 7-17-4 of this act, shall bar any recovery by the
borrower, his successors or assigns, for interest on or other compensation for
the use of the funds in such account for any period prior to July 1, 1979.
